North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-23.2 State Radio Broadcasting System [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, §
2]

Cross-References.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 37-17.3.

54-23.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-02.
State radio broadcasting system. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-03.
Political subdivisions may furnish receiving and transmitting sets for enforcement purposes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-04.
Broadcasting dispatches — Reports required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-04.1.
Lost or runaway children and missing persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-04.2.
School enrollment procedures to aid identification and location of missing children. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-05.
Emergency service for certain messages. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-06.
Law enforcement radio equipment on private automobiles prohibited without permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-07.
Maintenance of radio system — Personnel, equipment, and expense. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-08.
Payment for law enforcement system. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.

54-23.2-09.
Mobile data terminal and 911 service fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 2.